Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1908.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. Residential habilitation centers, also known as "RHCs," like the Yakima Valley School, Rainier School, Lakeland Village, and Fircrest School provide services to some of our state's most vulnerable individuals and their families. Washington state, like much of our country, has a mental and behavioral health care crisis that is causing increased rates of homelessness and substance abuse. Existing resident and respite care RHCs in our state that are both well run and well respected by the individuals, families, and communities they serve are being underutilized. Opening these facilities to new residents will provide immediate and effective relief to dozens of developmentally disabled individuals and their families who have no other viable and cost reasonable options for care.Sec. 2. RCW 71A.20.020 and 2011 1st sp.s. c 30 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(((1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the))The following residential habilitation centers are permanently established to provide services to persons with developmental disabilities: Lakeland Village, located at Medical Lake, Spokane county; Rainier School, located at Buckley, Pierce county; Yakima Valley School, located at Selah, Yakima county; and Fircrest School, located at Seattle, King county.(((2) The Yakima Valley School, located at Selah, Yakima county, shall cease to operate as a residential habilitation center when the conditions in RCW 71A.20.180(2)(b) are met.))NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. RCW 71A.20.180 (Closure of Yakima Valley SchoolâDepartment dutiesâContinuation of services) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 19 s 1 & 2011 1st sp.s. c 30 s 6 are each repealed.--- END ---